Utah statutes.
41-6a-906.   Designation of through highways -- Stop signs, yield signs, and
traffic-control devices -- Designation of intersections as locations for
preferential right-of-way treatment.
A highway authority, with reference to highways under its jurisdiction, may
erect and maintain stop signs, yield signs, or other traffic-control devices
to designate:
(1)  through highways; or
(2)  intersections or other roadway junctions at which vehicular traffic on
one or more of the roadways should yield or stop and yield before entering the
intersection or junction.
